src/morphology/stemparts/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_RINTEET


0:tee   N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ne       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_MURTEET


0:tee   N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:te    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:te   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:te   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:te   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:re   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tee N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:te  N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:te  N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_ALKEET


0:kee   N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:ke    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:ke    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ke    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:je       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PERKEET


0:kee   N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:je       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ke      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_SAMMALET


0:e    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0:ee   N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0       N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:e    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:e    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0       N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0       N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:e    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:e    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e    N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e      N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_TEN ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:e      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:e      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_POJAT


0:ja    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:ik   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:j   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ik   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:ik   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ika   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ik   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ika   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ja   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ik   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ika   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;


LEXICON N_VELJET

0:je    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:i     N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0:j     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:j     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:i     N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:je    N_COMPOUND_N    ;
0:j     N_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
